Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-2102
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the State Electrical Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Apprentice electrician means any person, other than a licensee, who, as such person's principal occupation, is engaged in learning and assisting in the installation, alteration, and repair of electrical equipment as an employee of a licensee and who is registered with the board. For purposes of this subdivision, persons who are not engaged in the installation, alteration, or repair of electrical wiring and apparatus, either inside or outside buildings, shall not be considered apprentice electricians;

(2) Board means the State Electrical Board;

(3) Class A master electrician means a person having the necessary qualifications, training, experience, and technical knowledge to properly plan, lay out, and supervise the installation of wiring, apparatus, and equipment for electric light, heat, power, and other purposes and who is licensed by the board;

(4) Class B electrical contractor means a person having the necessary qualifications, training, experience, and technical knowledge to properly plan, lay out, install, and supervise the installation of wiring, apparatus, and equipment for systems of not over four hundred ampere capacity for light, heat, power, and other purposes in any structure used and maintained as a residential dwelling but not larger than a four-family dwelling located in any municipality which has a population of less than one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census and who is licensed by the board;

(5) Class B journeyman electrician means a person having the necessary qualifications, training, experience, and technical knowledge to wire for or install electrical wiring, apparatus, and equipment for systems of not over four hundred ampere capacity for light, heat, power, and other purposes in any structure used and maintained as a residential dwelling but not larger than a four-family dwelling located in any municipality which has a population of less than one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census and who is licensed by the board;

(6) Class B master electrician means a person having the necessary qualifications, training, experience, and technical knowledge to properly plan, lay out, and supervise the installation of wiring, apparatus, and equipment for systems of not over four hundred ampere capacity for light, heat, power, and other purposes in any structure used and maintained as a residential dwelling but not larger than a four-family dwelling located in any municipality which has a population of less than one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census and who is licensed by the board;

(7) Commercial installation means an installation intended for commerce, but does not include a residential installation;

(8) Electrical contractor means a person having the necessary qualifications, training, experience, and technical knowledge to properly plan, lay out, install, and supervise the installation of wiring, apparatus, and equipment for electric light, heat, power, and other purposes and who is licensed by the board;

(9) Fire alarm installer means any person having the necessary qualifications, training, and experience to plan, lay out, and install electrical wiring, apparatus, and equipment for only those components of fire alarm systems that operate at fifty volts or less and who is licensed by the board;

(10) Industrial installation means an installation intended for use in the manufacture or processing of products involving systematic labor or habitual employment and includes installations in which agricultural or other products are habitually or customarily processed or stored for others, either by buying or reselling on a fee basis;

(11) Installer means a person who has the necessary qualifications, training, experience, and technical knowledge to properly lay out and install electrical wiring, apparatus, and equipment for major electrical home appliances on the load side of the main service in any municipality which has a population of less than one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census and who is licensed by the board;

(12) Inspector means a person certified as an electrical inspector upon such reasonable conditions as may be adopted by the board. The board may permit more than one class of electrical inspector;

(13) Journeyman electrician means a person having the necessary qualifications, training, experience, and technical knowledge to wire for or install electrical wiring, apparatus, and equipment and to supervise apprentice electricians and who is licensed by the board;

(14) New electrical installation means the installation of wiring, apparatus, and equipment for electric light, heat, power, and other purposes;

(15) Public-use building or facility means any building or facility designated for public use;

(16) Residential installation means an installation intended for a single-family or two-family residential dwelling or a multi-family residential dwelling not larger than three stories in height;

(17) Residential journeyman electrician means a person having the necessary qualifications, training, experience, and technical knowledge to wire for or install electrical wiring, apparatus, and equipment for residential installations and to supervise apprentice electricians and who is licensed by the board;

(18) Routine maintenance means the repair or replacement of existing electrical apparatus and equipment of the same size and type for which no changes in wiring are made; and

(19) Special electrician means a person having the necessary qualifications, training, and experience in wiring or installing special classes of electrical wiring, apparatus, equipment, or installations which shall include irrigation system wiring, well pump wiring, air conditioning and refrigeration installation, and sign installation and who is licensed by the board.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 2;

Laws 1978, LB 833, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 67, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1981, § 81-572;

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 126, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 914, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB113, § 60.